Utah statutes.
20A-7-507.   Evaluation by the local clerk.
(1)  When each initiative packet is received from a county clerk, the local
clerk shall check off from his record the number of each initiative packet
filed.
(2) (a)  After all of the initiative packets have been received by the local
clerk, the local clerk shall count the number of the names certified by the
county clerk that appear on each verified signature sheet.
(b)  If the total number of certified names from each verified signature sheet
equals or exceeds the number of names required by Section 20A-7-501, the local
clerk shall mark upon the front of the petition the word "sufficient."
(c)  If the total number of certified names from each verified signature sheet
does not equal or exceed the number of names required by Section 20A-7-501,
the local clerk shall mark upon the front of the petition the word
"insufficient."
(d)  The local clerk shall immediately notify any one of the sponsors of his
finding.
(3)  If the local clerk finds the total number of certified signatures from
each verified signature sheet to be insufficient, any sponsor may file a
written demand with the local clerk for a recount of the signatures appearing
on the initiative petition in the presence of any sponsor.
(4) (a)  Once a petition is declared insufficient, the sponsors may not submit
additional signatures to qualify the petition for the pending election.
(b)  If the petition is declared insufficient, the petition sponsors may
submit additional signatures to qualify the petition for:
(i)  the next regular general election following the pending regular general
election if the petition was a county initiative petition; or
(ii)  the next municipal general election if the petition was a municipal
initiative petition.
(5) (a)  If the local clerk refuses to accept and file any initiative
petition, any voter may apply to the supreme court for an extraordinary writ
to compel him to do so within ten days after the refusal.
(b)  If the supreme court determines that the initiative petition is legally
sufficient, the local clerk shall file it, with a verified copy of the
judgment attached to it, as of the date on which it was originally offered for
filing in his office.
(c)  If the supreme court determines that any petition filed is not legally
sufficient, the supreme court may enjoin the local clerk and all other
officers from certifying or printing the ballot title and numbers of that
measure on the official ballot for the next election.
